Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-777
Board of trustees; power suspended; administrator; assume powers.

Upon the issuance of a certificate of appointment by the Auditor of Public Accounts to a designated sanitary and improvement district administrator, the authority of the board of trustees of the district to exercise the powers of the district conferred by sections 31-727 to 31-770 shall be suspended. The administrator shall during the period of his or her appointment possess all of the powers of the board of trustees and shall possess exclusive authority to exercise the powers conferred in sections 31-727, 31-727.02, 31-733, 31-734, 31-737, 31-739, 31-740, 31-741 to 31-748, 31-749 to 31-756, 31-759, and 31-764 to 31-770.

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 39.